Georgia statutes. TITLE 46 Public Utilities and Public Transportation
CHAPTER 2A Electric Utilities Generally

46-2A-1.
Annual audit of affairs of electric utilities.

Each electric utility shall provide for the appointment by its board of directors of an audit committee consisting solely of directors who are not officers or employees of the electric utility. Such audit committee shall make an annual examination into the affairs of the electric utility and report the result of such audit in writing to the board of directors at its next regular meeting.

The report provided for in subsection (a) of this Code section shall state whether the electric utility is in a sound condition and whether adequate internal audit controls and procedures are being maintained and shall recommend to the board of directors such changes in the manner of conducting the affairs of the electric utility as shall be deemed advisable. The board of directors shall report in writing to the commission that such audit has been made and reviewed by the board of directors.

History.

Code 1933, § 93-1001, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 121, § 7.

46-2A-2.
Management audit of electric utilities.

Not more frequently than every five years, the commission shall cause to be performed a management audit of each electric utility to determine whether it is being managed in an efficient and effective manner.

The management audit provided for in this Code section shall be performed by a qualified and reputable management auditor of national reputation, to be selected by the commission from a list of not less than three such auditors, which list shall be made up by mutual agreement of the commission and the electric utility. The management auditor shall report the results of the audit to the commission.

In the event that the commission and the electric utility are unable to agree on a list of management auditors, either party may petition the Superior Court of Fulton County to select, within 30 days of filing, such a list after a hearing on the petition.

The audited electric utility shall pay for the management audit. The cost of the management audit shall be recognized by the commission as an operating expense of the utility; and the utility’s rates shall be fixed by the commission to recover this retail expense amortized over such period as the commission may direct.

History.

Code 1933, § 93-1002, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 121, § 7.